Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1249
Vessels; exemption from numbering.

A vessel shall not be required to be numbered pursuant to the State Boat Act if it is:

(1) Already covered by a number in full force and effect which has been awarded to it pursuant to federal law or a federally approved numbering system of another state and if such boat has not been within this state for a period in excess of sixty consecutive days;

(2) A vessel from a country other than the United States temporarily using the waters of this state;

(3) A vessel whose owner is the United States, a state, or a subdivision thereof; or

(4) A ship's lifeboat.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 49;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 119.